Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7494.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 17-20-13, 17-20-13.1 and 17-20-26 of the General Laws in Chapter
17-20 entitled "Mail Ballots" are hereby amended to read as follows:
17-20-13. Form of application.
The application to be subscribed by the voters before receiving a mail ballot shall, in
addition to those directions that may be printed, stamped, or written on it by authority of the
secretary of state, be in substantially the following form:
STATE OF RHODE ISLAND APPLICATION OF VOTER FOR BALLOT FOR ELECTION
ON_________________________________________
(COMPLETE HIGHLIGHTED SECTIONS)


NOTE — THIS APPLICATION MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE BOARD OF
CANVASSERS OF YOUR CITY OR TOWN NOT LATER THAN 4:00 P.M. ON


BOX A (PRINT OR TYPE)

NAME_________________________________________


VOTING ADDRESS_________________________________________

CITY/TOWN_______________________________________ STATE RI ZIP
CODE_________________________________________

DATE OF BIRTH_______________________________________ PHONE
#_________________________________________
RHODE ISLAND DRIVER'S LICENSE/STATE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OR THE LAST
FOUR (4) DIGITS OF YOUR SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER___________________________________


BOX B (PRINT OR TYPE)

NAME OF INSTITUTION (IF
APPLICABLE)_________________________________________

ADDRESS_________________________________________

ADDRESS_________________________________________

CITY/TOWN_______________________________________ STATE___________ ZIP
CODE_________________________________________

FACSIMILE NUMBER (if applicable)_________________________________________

I CERTIFY THAT I AM ELIGIBLE FOR A MAIL BALLOT ON THE FOLLOWING BASIS:
(CHECK ONE ONLY)
( ) 1. I am incapacitated to such an extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at
the polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness, or a serious impairment of
mobility. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration address (BOX A above)
please provide the Rhode Island address where you are temporarily residing in BOX B above.

( ) 2. I am confined in a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, rest home, or similar
LC004580 - Page 2 of 8

institution within the State of Rhode Island. Provide the name and address of the facility where
you are residing in BOX B above

( ) 3. I am employed or in service intimately connected with military operations or
because I am a spouse or dependent of such person, or I am a United States citizen and will be
outside the United States. Complete BOX B above or the ballot will be mailed to the local board
of canvassers.

( ) 4. I may not be able to vote at the polling place in my city or town on the day of the
election. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration address (BOX A above) please
provide the address within the United States where you are temporarily residing in BOX B above.
If you request that your ballot be sent to your local board of canvassers please indicate so in BOX
B above.

BOX D OATH OF VOTER
I declare under the pains and penalty of perjury that all of the information I have provided
on this form is true and correct to the best of my knowledge. I further state that I am not a
qualified voter of any other city or town or state and have not claimed and do not intend to claim
the right to vote in any other city or town or state. If unable to sign name because of blindness,
disability, or inability to read or write, the applicant shall mark the box to indicate the voter
cannot sign due to blindness, disability, or inability to read or write, and include the full name,
residence address, signature, and optionally the telephone number and e-mail address of the
person who provided assistance to the voter.
SIGNATURE IN FULL_________________________________________
Please note: A Power of Attorney signature is not valid in Rhode Island.
17-20-13.1. Form of emergency mail ballot application.
The emergency mail ballot application to be subscribed by the voters before receiving a
mail ballot shall, in addition to any directions that may be printed, stamped, or written on the
application by authority of the secretary of state, be in substantially the following form:
STATE OF RHODE ISLAND
EMERGENCY APPLICATION OF VOTER FOR BALLOT FOR ELECTION
ON_________________________________________
(COMPLETE HIGHLIGHTED SECTIONS)
NOTE — THIS APPLICATION MUST BE RECEIVED BY THE BOARD OF
LC004580 - Page 3 of 8

CANVASSERS OF YOUR CITY OR TOWN NOT LATER THAN 4:00 P.M. ON
______________
BOX A (PRINT OR TYPE)
NAME_________________________________________
VOTING ADDRESS_________________________________________
CITY/TOWN_______________________________________ STATE RI
ZIP CODE_________________________________________
DATE OF BIRTH_______________________________________
RHODE ISLAND DRIVER'S LICENSE/STATE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OR THE LAST
FOUR (4) DIGITS OF YOUR SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER___________________________________
PHONE#_________________________________________
BOX B (PRINT OR TYPE)
NAME OF INSTITUTION (IF APPLICABLE) ______________________________
ADDRESS_________________________________________
ADDRESS_________________________________________
CITY/TOWN_______________________________________ STATE___________
ZIP CODE_________________________________________
I CERTIFY THAT I AM ELIGIBLE FOR A MAIL BALLOT ON THE FOLLOWING BASIS:
(CHECK ONE ONLY)
( ) 1. I am incapacitated to such an extent that it would be an undue hardship to vote at the
polls because of illness, mental or physical disability, blindness or a serious impairment of mobility.
If not voting ballot at local board, ballot will be mailed to the address in BOX A above or to the
Rhode Island address provided in BOX B above. If the ballot is to be delivered by the local board
of canvassers to a person presenting written authorization to pick up the ballot, complete BOX A
above and fill in the person’s name below.
I hereby authorize
_______________________________________________________________________ to pick
up my ballot at my local board of canvassers.
( ) 2. I am confined in a hospital, convalescent home, nursing home, rest home, or similar
institution within the State of Rhode Island. Provide the name and address of the facility where you
are residing in BOX B above.
( ) 3. I am employed or in service intimately connected with military operations or because
I am a spouse or dependent of such person, or I am a United States citizen who will be outside the
LC004580 - Page 4 of 8

United States. If not voting ballot at local board, provide address in BOX B above.
( ) 4. I choose to vote by mail. If the ballot is not being mailed to your voter registration
address (BOX A above) please provide the address within the United States where you are
temporarily residing in BOX B above. If you request that your ballot be sent to your local board of
canvassers please indicate so in BOX B above.
I hereby authorize
_____________________________________________________________________ to pick up
my ballot at my local board of canvassers.
BOX D OATH OF VOTER
I declare that all of the information I have provided on this form is true and correct to the
best of my knowledge. I further state that I am not a qualified voter of any other city or town or
state and have not claimed and do not intend to claim the right to vote in any other city or town or
state. If unable to sign name because of physical incapacity or otherwise, applicant shall make his
or her mark “X”.
SIGNATURE IN FULL_________________________________________
Please note: A Power of Attorney signature is not valid in Rhode Island.
17-20-26. Opening and counting of ballots.
(a)(1) Beginning prior to and continuing on election day the state board, upon receipt of
mail ballots, shall keep the ballots in a safe and secure place that shall be separate and apart from
the general public area and sufficiently monitored through security measures including security
cameras. The board shall, beginning twenty (20) days prior to and continuing on election day,
proceed to certify the mail ballots.
(2) Notice of these sessions shall be given to the public on the state board of elections’
website and the secretary of state’s website posted at least twenty-four (24) hours before the
commencing of any session. All candidates for state and federal office, as well as all state party
chairpersons, shall be given notice by telephone, email or otherwise of the day on which ballots
will be certified; provided, that failure to effect the notice shall in no way invalidate the ballots.
(b) This processing shall be done within a railed space in the room in which it takes place
secure area, and the board shall admit within the railed space, provide an area for public observation
of the process in accordance with those rules that the board shall adopt, to witness the processing
and certification of the ballots, the interested voter or the voter’s representative, the candidates, or
at least one representative of each candidate for whom votes are at the time being processed, and
an equal number of representatives of each political party. These representatives shall be authorized
in writing by the voter, the candidate, or the chairperson of the state committee of the political
LC004580 - Page 5 of 8

party, respectively, as the case may be. The board shall also, in accordance with these rules, admit
representatives of the press and newscasting agencies and any other persons that it deems proper.
(c) At these sessions, and before certifying any ballot, the state board shall:
(1) Determine the city or town in which the voter cast his or her ballot; and
(2) Compare the name, residence, and signature of the voter as it appears on the
certification envelope, with the name, residence, and signature on the central voter registration
system for mail ballots and satisfy itself that both signatures are identical. The board shall designate
two (2) persons, to review and compare each voter’s signature with the voter’s signature found in
the central voter registration system. If both designees agree that the signatures match, the mail
ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that one or both designees
find a discrepancy with the voter’s signature, the certification envelope shall then be reviewed by
a pair of supervising board staff members. If the pair of supervising board staff members find that
the signatures match, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In
the event that one or both supervising board staff members find a discrepancy in the voter’s
signature, the supervising board staff shall compare the signature on the certification envelope to
the signature on the voter’s ballot application, and may also consider other identifiers, including
the voter’s Rhode Island driver license number/state identification number, or the last four (4) digits
of the voter’s Social Security number, as provided by the voter on the mail ballot application. If the
pair of supervising board staff members find that those signatures match the voter’s signature is
valid, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that
one or both supervising board staff members continue to find a discrepancy in with the voter’s
signature, the supervising board staff shall compare the signature on the certification envelope to
the voter’s ballot application. If the pair of supervising board staff members find that the signatures
match, then the mail ballot shall proceed to be processed, certified, and tabulated. In the event that
one or both supervising board staff members find a discrepancy in the voter’s signature, the
certification envelope shall be segregated, and the board will notify the voter of the discrepancy, in
accordance with regulations and procedures promulgated by the board. Any segregated certification
envelope that has not been cured or fully addressed by the voter, in accordance with the board’s
promulgated regulations and procedures, shall be reviewed by the board to make a final
determination on the signature set forth on the validity of the mail ballot application and
certification envelope.
(d) [Deleted by P.L. 2015, ch. 259, § 1.]
(e) The board shall promulgate regulations that allow for challenges to the certification
process by the interested voter, the voter’s representative, the candidates, and representatives of the
LC004580 - Page 6 of 8

recognized political parties. Such challenges shall be made to the executive director of the board,
or the executive director’s designee. The decision of the executive director or designee shall be
subject to review by the board.
(f) After processing and certification of the mail ballots, they shall be separated in packages
in accordance with their respective cities and towns, in the presence of all interested parties.
Thereupon, in each instance the board staff shall open the enclosing envelope, and without looking
at the votes cast on the enclosed ballot, shall remove the ballot from the envelope. The board staff
shall proceed to tabulate the ballots through the use of a central count optical-scan unit with the
same effect as if the ballots had been cast by the electors in open town or district meetings.
(g) When a local election is held at a time other than in conjunction with a statewide
election, the state board, after the processing and certification of the mail ballots cast in the local
election, shall have the authority to count the ballots in the same manner and with the same effect
as state mail ballots are counted by the state board in a statewide election. Once the ballots are
counted, the results shall be transmitted to the local board.
(h) When a local election is held in New Shoreham at a time other than in conjunction with
a statewide election, the state board, after the processing and certification of the mail ballots cast
in the local election, shall have the authority to count the ballots in the same manner and with the
same effect as state mail ballots are counted by the state board in a statewide election. Once the
ballots are counted, the results shall be sent via facsimile to the local board in New Shoreham.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004580
========
LC004580 - Page 7 of 8